Ohio, session 136, SB443.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 3301.0711, 3310.03, 3310.13, 3310.14, 3310.15, 3313.618, 3313.619, 3313.976, 3314.03, 3319.324, and 3326.11 be amended and sections 117.113, 3301.165, 3301.166, 3301.167, 3302.0311, and 3313.6612 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 117.113. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Public money" includes any funds a qualifying school receives from the state for any of the following: (a) Participation in the educational choice scholarship program established under sections 3310.01 to 3310.17 of the Revised Code or the pilot project scholarship program established under sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code; (b) Administrative and clerical cost reimbursements prescribed under section 3317.063 of the Revised Code; (c) Auxiliary services reimbursements prescribed under section 3317.064 of the Revised Code. (2) "Qualifying school" has the same meaning as in section 3301.166 of the Revised Code. (B) Each fiscal year, the auditor of state shall audit the specific funds or accounts of each qualifying school in the state into which public money has been placed or deposited for that fiscal year. Sec. 3301.0711. (A) The department of education and workforce shall: (1) Annually furnish to, grade, and score all assessments required by divisions (A)(1) and (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code to be administered by city, local, exempted village, and joint vocational school districts, except that each district shall score any assessment administered pursuant to division (B)(10) of this section. Each assessment so furnished shall include the data verification code of the student to whom the assessment will be administered, as assigned pursuant to division (D)(2) of section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code. In furnishing the practice versions of Ohio graduation tests prescribed by division (D) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code, the department shall make the tests available on its web site for reproduction by districts. In awarding contracts for grading assessments, the department shall give preference to Ohio-based entities employing Ohio residents. (2) Adopt rules for the ethical use of assessments and prescribing the manner in which the assessments prescribed by section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code shall be administered to students. (B) Except as provided in divisions (C) and (J) of this section, the board of education of each city, local, and exempted village school district shall, in accordance with rules adopted under division (A) of this section: (1) Administer the English language arts assessments prescribed under division (A)(1)(a) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code twice annually to all students in the third grade who have not attained the score designated for that assessment under division (A)(2)(c) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code. (2) Administer the mathematics assessment prescribed under division (A)(1)(a) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code at least once annually to all students in the third grade. (3) Administer the assessments prescribed under division (A)(1)(b) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code at least once annually to all students in the fourth grade. (4) Administer the assessments prescribed under division (A)(1)(c) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code at least once annually to all students in the fifth grade. (5) Administer the assessments prescribed under division (A)(1)(d) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code at least once annually to all students in the sixth grade. (6) Administer the assessments prescribed under division (A)(1)(e) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code at least once annually to all students in the seventh grade. (7) Administer the assessments prescribed under division (A)(1)(f) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code at least once annually to all students in the eighth grade. (8) Except as provided in division (B)(9) of this section, administer any assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code as follows: (a) At least once annually to all tenth grade students and at least twice annually to all students in eleventh or twelfth grade who have not yet attained the score on that assessment designated under that division; (b) To any person who has successfully completed the curriculum in any high school or the individualized education program developed for the person by any high school pursuant to section 3323.08 of the Revised Code but has not received a high school diploma and who requests to take such assessment, at any time such assessment is administered in the district. (9) In lieu of the board of education of any city, local, or exempted village school district in which the student is also enrolled, the board of a joint vocational school district shall administer any assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code at least twice annually to any student enrolled in the joint vocational school district who has not yet attained the score on that assessment designated under that division. A board of a joint vocational school district may also administer such an assessment to any student described in division (B)(8)(b) of this section. (10) If the district has a three-year average graduation rate of not more than seventy-five per cent, administer each assessment prescribed by division (D) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code in September to all ninth grade students who entered ninth grade prior to July 1, 2014. Except as provided in section 3313.614 of the Revised Code for administration of an assessment to a person who has fulfilled the curriculum requirement for a high school diploma but has not passed one or more of the required assessments, the assessments prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code shall not be administered after the date specified in the rules adopted under division (D)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. (11)(a) Except as provided in divisions (B)(11)(b) and (c) of this section, administer the assessments prescribed by division (B)(2) of section 3301.0710 and section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code in accordance with the timeline and plan for implementation of those assessments prescribed by rule adopted under division (D)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code; (b) A student who has presented evidence to the district or school of having satisfied the condition prescribed by division (A)(1) of section 3313.618 of the Revised Code to qualify for a high school diploma prior to the date of the administration of the assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code shall not be required to take that assessment. However, no board shall prohibit a student who is not required to take such assessment from taking the assessment. (c) A student shall not be required to retake the Algebra I end-of-course examination or the English language arts II end-of-course examination prescribed under division (B)(2) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code in grades nine through twelve if the student demonstrates at least a proficient level of skill, as prescribed under division (B)(5)(a) of that section, or achieves a competency score, as prescribed under division (B)(10) of that section, in an administration of the examination prior to grade nine. (C)(1)(a) In the case of a student receiving special education services under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code, the individualized education program developed for the student under that chapter shall specify the manner in which the student will participate in the assessments administered under this section, except that a student with significant cognitive disabilities to whom an alternate assessment is administered in accordance with division (C)(1) of this section and a student determined to have a disability that includes an intellectual disability as outlined in guidance issued by the department shall not be required to take the assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. The individualized education program may excuse the student from taking any particular assessment required to be administered under this section if it instead specifies an alternate assessment method approved by the department as conforming to requirements of federal law for receipt of federal funds for disadvantaged pupils. To the extent possible, the individualized education program shall not excuse the student from taking an assessment unless no reasonable accommodation can be made to enable the student to take the assessment. No board shall prohibit a student who is not required to take an assessment under division (C)(1) of this section from taking the assessment. (b) Any alternate assessment approved by the department for a student under this division shall produce measurable results comparable to those produced by the assessment it replaces in order to allow for the student's results to be included in the data compiled for a school district or building under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. (c)(i) Any student enrolled in a chartered nonpublic school who has been identified, based on an evaluation conducted in accordance with section 3323.03 of the Revised Code or section 504 of the "Rehabilitation Act of 1973," 87 Stat. 355, 29 U.S.C.A. 794, as amended, as a child with a disability shall be excused from taking any particular assessment required to be administered under this section if either of the following apply: (I) A plan developed for the student pursuant to rules adopted by the department excuses the student from taking that assessment. (II) The chartered nonpublic school develops a written plan in which the school, in consultation with the student's parents, determines that an assessment or alternative assessment with accommodations does not accurately assess the student's academic performance. The plan shall include an academic profile of the student's academic performance and shall be reviewed annually to determine if the student's needs continue to require excusal from taking the assessment. (ii) A student with significant cognitive disabilities to whom an alternate assessment is administered in accordance with division (C)(1) of this section and a student determined to have a disability that includes an intellectual disability as outlined in guidance issued by the department shall not be required to take the assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. (iii) In the case of any student so excused from taking an assessment under division (C)(1)(c) of this section, the chartered nonpublic school shall not prohibit the student from taking the assessment. (2) A district board may, for medical reasons or other good cause, excuse a student from taking an assessment administered under this section on the date scheduled, but that assessment shall be administered to the excused student not later than nine days following the scheduled date. The district board shall annually report the number of students who have not taken one or more of the assessments required by this section to the department not later than the thirtieth day of June. (3) No school district board shall excuse any English learner from taking any particular assessment required to be administered under this section, except that any English learner who has been enrolled in United States schools for less than two years and for whom no appropriate accommodations are available based on guidance issued by the department shall not be required to take the assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. However, no board shall prohibit an English learner who is not required to take that assessment from taking the assessment. A board may permit any English learner to take an assessment required to be administered under this section with appropriate accommodations, as determined by the department. For each English learner, each school district shall annually assess that student's progress in learning English, in accordance with procedures approved by the department. The guidance and procedures issued by the department for the purposes of division (C)(3) of this section shall comply with the rules adopted under section 3301.0731 of the Revised Code. (4)(a) The governing authority of a chartered nonpublic school may excuse an English learner from taking any assessment administered under this section. (b) No governing authority shall require an English learner who has been enrolled in United States schools for less than two years and for whom no appropriate accommodations are available based on guidance issued by the department to take the assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. (c) No governing authority shall prohibit an English learner from taking an assessment from which the student was excused under division (C)(4) of this section. (D)(1) In the school year next succeeding the school year in which the assessments prescribed by division (A)(1) or (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code or former division (A)(1), (A)(2), or (B) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to September 11, 2001, are administered to any student, the board of education of any school district in which the student is enrolled in that year shall provide to the student intervention services commensurate with the student's performance, including any intensive intervention required under section 3313.608 of the Revised Code, in any skill in which the student failed to demonstrate at least a score at the proficient level on the assessment. (2) Following any administration of the assessments prescribed by division (D) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code to ninth grade students, each school district that has a three-year average graduation rate of not more than seventy-five per cent shall determine for each high school in the district whether the school shall be required to provide intervention services to any students who took the assessments. In determining which high schools shall provide intervention services based on the resources available, the district shall consider each school's graduation rate and scores on the practice assessments. The district also shall consider the scores received by ninth grade students on the English language arts and mathematics assessments prescribed under division (A)(1)(f) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code in the eighth grade in determining which high schools shall provide intervention services. Each high school selected to provide intervention services under this division shall provide intervention services to any student whose results indicate that the student is failing to make satisfactory progress toward being able to attain scores at the proficient level on the Ohio graduation tests. Intervention services shall be provided in any skill in which a student demonstrates unsatisfactory progress and shall be commensurate with the student's performance. Schools shall provide the intervention services prior to the end of the school year, during the summer following the ninth grade, in the next succeeding school year, or at any combination of those times. (E) Except as provided in section 3313.608 of the Revised Code and division (N) of this section, no school district board of education shall utilize any student's failure to attain a specified score on an assessment administered under this section as a factor in any decision to deny the student promotion to a higher grade level. However, a district board may choose not to promote to the next grade level any student who does not take an assessment administered under this section or make up an assessment as provided by division (C)(2) of this section and who is not exempt from the requirement to take the assessment under division (C)(3) of this section. (F) No person shall be charged a fee for taking any assessment administered under this section. (G)(1) Each school district board shall designate one location for the collection of assessments administered in the spring under division (B)(1) of this section and those administered under divisions (B)(2) to (7) of this section. Each district board shall submit the assessments to the entity with which the department contracts for the scoring of the assessments as follows: (a) If the district's total enrollment in grades kindergarten through twelve during the first full school week of October was less than two thousand five hundred, not later than the Friday after all of the assessments have been administered; (b) If the district's total enrollment in grades kindergarten through twelve during the first full school week of October was two thousand five hundred or more, but less than seven thousand, not later than the Monday after all of the assessments have been administered; (c) If the district's total enrollment in grades kindergarten through twelve during the first full school week of October was seven thousand or more, not later than the Tuesday after all of the assessments have been administered. However, any assessment that a student takes during the make-up period described in division (C)(2) of this section shall be submitted not later than the Friday following the day the student takes the assessment. (2) The department or an entity with which the department contracts for the scoring of the assessment shall send to each school district board a list of the individual scores of all persons taking a state achievement assessment as follows: (a) Except as provided in division (G)(2)(b) or (c) of this section, within forty-five days after the administration of the assessments prescribed by sections 3301.0710 and 3301.0712 of the Revised Code, but in no case shall the scores be returned later than the thirtieth day of June following the administration; (b) In the case of the third-grade English language arts assessment, within forty-five days after the administration of that assessment, but in no case shall the scores be returned later than the fifteenth day of June following the administration; (c) In the case of the writing component of an assessment or end-of-course examination in the area of English language arts, except for the third-grade English language arts assessment, the results may be sent after forty-five days of the administration of the writing component, but in no case shall the scores be returned later than the thirtieth day of June following the administration. (3) For assessments administered under this section by a joint vocational school district, the department or entity shall also send to each city, local, or exempted village school district a list of the individual scores of any students of such city, local, or exempted village school district who are attending school in the joint vocational school district. (4) Beginning with the 2019-2020 school year, a school district, other public school, or chartered nonpublic school may administer the third-grade English language arts or mathematics assessment, or both, in a paper format in any school year for which the district board of education or school governing body adopts a resolution indicating that the district or school chooses to administer the assessment in a paper format. The board or governing body shall submit a copy of the resolution to the department of education and workforce not later than the first day of May prior to the school year for which it will apply. If the resolution is submitted, the district or school shall administer the assessment in a paper format to all students in the third grade, except that any student whose individualized education program or plan developed under section 504 of the "Rehabilitation Act of 1973," 87 Stat. 355, 29 U.S.C. 794, as amended, specifies that taking the assessment in an online format is an appropriate accommodation for the student may take the assessment in an online format. (5) A classical school may administer all assessments administered under this section in a paper format, except that any student whose individualized education program or plan developed under section 504 of the "Rehabilitation Act of 1973," 29 U.S.C. 794 specifies that taking the assessment in an online format is an appropriate accommodation for the student may take the assessment in an online format. (H) Individual scores on any assessments administered under this section shall be released by a district board only in accordance with section 3319.321 of the Revised Code and the rules adopted under division (A) of this section. No district board or its employees shall utilize individual or aggregate results in any manner that conflicts with rules for the ethical use of assessments adopted pursuant to division (A) of this section. (I) Except as provided in division (G) of this section, the department or an entity with which the department contracts for the scoring of the assessment shall not release any individual scores on any assessment administered under this section. The department shall adopt rules to ensure the protection of student confidentiality at all times. The rules may require the use of the data verification codes assigned to students pursuant to division (D)(2) of section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code to protect the confidentiality of student scores. (J) Notwithstanding division (D) of section 3311.52 of the Revised Code, this section does not apply to the board of education of any cooperative education school district except as provided under rules adopted pursuant to this division. (1) In accordance with rules that the department shall adopt, the board of education of any city, exempted village, or local school district with territory in a cooperative education school district established pursuant to divisions (A) to (C) of section 3311.52 of the Revised Code may enter into an agreement with the board of education of the cooperative education school district for administering any assessment prescribed under this section to students of the city, exempted village, or local school district who are attending school in the cooperative education school district. (2) In accordance with rules that the department shall adopt, the board of education of any city, exempted village, or local school district with territory in a cooperative education school district established pursuant to section 3311.521 of the Revised Code shall enter into an agreement with the cooperative district that provides for the administration of any assessment prescribed under this section to both of the following: (a) Students who are attending school in the cooperative district and who, if the cooperative district were not established, would be entitled to attend school in the city, local, or exempted village school district pursuant to section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code; (b) Persons described in division (B)(8)(b) of this section. Any assessment of students pursuant to such an agreement shall be in lieu of any assessment of such students or persons pursuant to this section. (K)(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (K)(1) or (2) of this section, each chartered nonpublic school for which at least sixty-five per cent of its total enrollment is made up of students who are participating in state scholarship programs shall administer the assessments prescribed by division (A) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code or an alternative standardized assessment determined by the department. In accordance with procedures and deadlines prescribed by the department, the parent or guardian of a student enrolled in the school who is not participating in a state scholarship program may submit notice to the chief administrative officer of the school that the parent or guardian does not wish to have the student take the assessments prescribed for the student's grade level under division (A) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code. If a parent or guardian submits an opt-out notice, the school shall not administer the assessments to that student. This option does not apply to any assessment required for a high school diploma under section 3313.612 of the Revised Code. (b) Any chartered nonpublic school that enrolls students who are participating in state scholarship programs may administer an alternative standardized assessment determined by the department instead of the assessments prescribed by division (A) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code to any student who satisfies one of the following conditions: (i) The student is participating in the autism scholarship program established under section 3310.41 of the Revised Code. (ii) The student is participating in the Jon Peterson special needs scholarship program established under sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code. (iii) The student is not participating in a state scholarship program. Each chartered nonpublic school subject to division (K)(1)(a) or (b) of this section shall report the results of each assessment administered under those divisions to the department. (2) A chartered nonpublic school may submit to the director of education and workforce a request for a waiver from administering the elementary assessments prescribed by division (A) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code. The director shall approve or disapprove a request for a waiver submitted under division (K)(2) of this section. To be eligible to submit a request for a waiver, a chartered nonpublic school shall meet the following conditions: (a) At least ninety-five per cent of the students enrolled in the school are children with disabilities, as defined under section 3323.01 of the Revised Code, or have received a diagnosis by a school district or from a physician, including a neuropsychiatrist or psychiatrist, or a psychologist who is authorized to practice in this or another state as having a condition that impairs academic performance, such as dyslexia, dyscalculia, attention deficit hyperactivity disorder, or Asperger's syndrome. (b) The school has solely served a student population described in division (K)(1)(a) of this section for at least ten years. (c) The school provides to the department at least five years of records of internal testing conducted by the school that affords the department data required for accountability purposes, including diagnostic assessments and nationally standardized norm-referenced achievement assessments that measure reading and math skills. (3) Any chartered nonpublic school that is not subject to division (K)(1) of this section may participate in the assessment program by administering any of the assessments prescribed by division (A) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code. The chief administrator of the school shall specify which assessments the school will administer. Such specification shall be made in writing to the director prior to the first day of August of any school year in which assessments are administered and shall include a pledge that the nonpublic school will administer the specified assessments in the same manner as public schools are required to do under this section and rules adopted by the department. (4) The department shall furnish the assessments prescribed by section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code to each chartered nonpublic school that is subject to division (K)(1) of this section or participates under division (K)(3) of this section. (L) If a chartered nonpublic school is educating students in grades nine through twelve, the following shall apply: (1) Except as provided in division (L)(4) of this section, for a student who is enrolled in a chartered nonpublic school that is accredited through the independent schools association of the central states and who is attending the school under a state scholarship program that is not a general education state scholarship program, the student shall either take all of the assessments prescribed by division (B) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code or take an alternative assessment approved by the department under section 3313.619 of the Revised Code. A student attending the school under a general education state scholarship program shall take all of the assessments prescribed under division (B) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. However, a student who is excused from taking an assessment under division (C) of this section or has presented evidence to the chartered nonpublic school of having satisfied the condition prescribed by division (A)(1) of section 3313.618 of the Revised Code to qualify for a high school diploma prior to the date of the administration of the assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code shall not be required to take that assessment. No governing authority of a chartered nonpublic school shall prohibit a student who is not required to take such assessment from taking the assessment. (2) For a student who is enrolled in a chartered nonpublic school that is accredited through the independent schools association of the central states, and who is not attending the school under a state scholarship program, the student shall not be required to take any assessment prescribed under section 3301.0712 or 3313.619 of the Revised Code. (3)(a) Except as provided in divisions (L)(3)(b) and (4) of this section, for a student who is enrolled in a chartered nonpublic school that is not accredited through the independent schools association of the central states, regardless of whether either of the following apply to that student: (i) If the student is attending or is not attending the school under a state participating in a general education state scholarship program, the student shall take all of the assessments prescribed by division (B) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. (ii) If the student is not participating in a general education state scholarship program, the student shall do one of the following: (i)(I) Take all of the assessments prescribed by division (B) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code; (ii)(II) Take only the assessment prescribed by division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code, provided that the student's school publishes the results of that assessment for each graduating class. The published results of that assessment shall include the overall composite scores, mean scores, twenty-fifth percentile scores, and seventy-fifth percentile scores for each subject area of the assessment. (iii)(III) Take an alternative assessment approved by the department under section 3313.619 of the Revised Code. (b) A student who is excused from taking an assessment under division (C) of this section or has presented evidence to the chartered nonpublic school of having satisfied the condition prescribed by division (A)(1) of section 3313.618 of the Revised Code to qualify for a high school diploma prior to the date of the administration of the assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code shall not be required to take that assessment. No governing authority of a chartered nonpublic school shall prohibit a student who is not required to take such assessment from taking the assessment. (4) The assessments prescribed by sections 3301.0712 and 3313.619 of the Revised Code shall not be administered to any student attending the school, if the school meets all of the following conditions: (a) At least ninety-five per cent of the students enrolled in the school are children with disabilities, as defined under section 3323.01 of the Revised Code, or have received a diagnosis by a school district or from a physician, including a neuropsychologist or psychiatrist, or a psychologist who is authorized to practice in this or another state as having a condition that impairs academic performance, such as dyslexia, dyscalculia, attention deficit hyperactivity disorder, or Asperger's syndrome. (b) The school has solely served a student population described in division (L)(4)(a) of this section for at least ten years. (c) The school makes available to the department at least five years of records of internal testing conducted by the school that affords the department data required for accountability purposes, including growth in student achievement in reading or mathematics, or both, as measured by nationally norm-referenced assessments that have developed appropriate standards for students. Division (L)(4) of this section applies to any student attending such school regardless of whether the student receives special education or related services and regardless of whether the student is attending the school under a state scholarship program. (M)(1) The superintendent of Ohio deaf and blind education services shall administer the assessments described by sections 3301.0710 and 3301.0712 of the Revised Code for the state school for the blind and the state school for the deaf. The superintendent of Ohio deaf and blind education services shall administer the assessments in the same manner as district boards are required to do under this section and rules adopted by the department and in conformity with division (C)(1)(a) of this section. (2) The department shall furnish the assessments described by sections 3301.0710 and 3301.0712 of the Revised Code to the superintendent of Ohio deaf and blind education services. (N) Notwithstanding division (E) of this section, a school district may use a student's failure to attain a score in at least the proficient range on the mathematics assessment described by division (A)(1)(a) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code or on an assessment described by division (A)(1)(b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code as a factor in retaining that student in the current grade level. (O)(1) In the manner specified in divisions (O)(3) and (4) of this section, the assessments required by division (A)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code shall become public records pursuant to section 149.43 of the Revised Code on the thirty-first day of July following the school year that the assessments were administered. (2) The department may field test proposed questions with samples of students to determine the validity, reliability, or appropriateness of questions for possible inclusion in a future year's assessment. The department also may use anchor questions on assessments to ensure that different versions of the same assessment are of comparable difficulty. Field test questions and anchor questions shall not be considered in computing scores for individual students. Field test questions and anchor questions may be included as part of the administration of any assessment required by division (A)(1) or (B) of section 3301.0710 and division (B) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. (3) Any field test question or anchor question administered under division (O)(2) of this section shall not be a public record. Such field test questions and anchor questions shall be redacted from any assessments which are released as a public record pursuant to division (O)(1) of this section. (4) Division (O)(4) of this section applies to the assessments prescribed by division (A) of section 3301.0710 and division (B)(2) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. Beginning with the assessments administered in the spring of the 2025-2026 school year, the department shall determine which questions on each assessment that are used to compute a student's score are a public record, if any. The department shall determine which questions will be needed for reuse on a future assessment and those questions shall not be public records and shall be redacted from the assessment prior to its release as a public record. However, for each redacted question, the department shall inform each city, local, and exempted village school district of the corresponding statewide academic standard adopted under section 3301.079 of the Revised Code and the corresponding benchmark to which the question relates. The department is not required to provide corresponding standards and benchmarks to field test questions that are redacted under division (O)(3) of this section. (P) As used in this section: (1) "Three-year average" means the average of the most recent consecutive three school years of data. (2) "Dropout" means a student who withdraws from school before completing course requirements for graduation and who is not enrolled in an education program approved by the department or an education program outside the state. "Dropout" does not include a student who has departed the country. (3) "Graduation rate" means the ratio of students receiving a diploma to the number of students who entered ninth grade four years earlier. Students who transfer into the district are added to the calculation. Students who transfer out of the district for reasons other than dropout are subtracted from the calculation. If a student who was a dropout in any previous year returns to the same school district, that student shall be entered into the calculation as if the student had entered ninth grade four years before the graduation year of the graduating class that the student joins. (4) "State scholarship programs" means the educational choice scholarship pilot program established under sections 3310.01 to 3310.17 of the Revised Code, the autism scholarship program established under section 3310.41 of the Revised Code, the Jon Peterson special needs scholarship program established under sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code, and the pilot project scholarship program established under sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code. (5) "Other public school" means a community school established under Chapter 3314., a STEM school established under Chapter 3326., or a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code. (6) "English learner" has the same meaning as in section 3301.0731 of the Revised Code. (7) "Classical school" means a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code that is a member of the Ohio classical school association, or its successor organization, and uses a curriculum substantially similar to that of a nationally recognized classical school network. (8) "General education state scholarship program" has the same meaning as in section 3301.165 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3301.165. (A) As used in this section: (1) "General education state scholarship program" means the educational choice scholarship pilot program established under sections 3310.01 to 3310.17 of the Revised Code or the pilot project scholarship program established under sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code. (2) "Information technology center" means an information technology center established under section 3301.075 of the Revised Code. (3) "Scholarship student" means a student who is participating in a general education state scholarship program. (B) Annually, each chartered nonpublic school that enrolls scholarship students shall submit to the department of education and workforce, in a form and manner prescribed by the department, a report regarding expenditures the school made using the state funds it received under a general education state scholarship program in that school year. The department shall post each report it receives on its publicly accessible web site. A chartered nonpublic school may contract with an information technology center for assistance with complying with the reporting requirement prescribed under this division. Sec. 3301.166. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Community school" means a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code. (2) "Qualifying school" means a chartered nonpublic school of which at least ten per cent of its total enrollment is made up of scholarship students. (3) "Scholarship student" has the same meaning as in section 3301.165 of the Revised Code. (4) "STEM school" means a STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code. (B) Each chartered nonpublic school that enrolls scholarship students shall include in its admission procedure a method to determine which students to admit if the number of applicants for a grade level, school building, or education program exceeds the school's capacity. Each school shall report to the department of education and workforce, in a form and manner established by the department, its method for such determinations. (C) Annually, each qualifying school shall do all of the following: (1) Report to the department, in a form and manner established by the department, all of the following for the school year: (a) The school's total enrollment and its capacity limits by grade level, school building, and education program; (b) The number of scholarship students enrolled in the school. The department also shall disaggregate that number of students by whether, in the prior school year, the students were enrolled in one of the following: (i) That school; (ii) A different chartered nonpublic school; (iii) A nonchartered nonpublic school; (iv) A municipal, city, local, or exempted village school district; (v) A community school; (vi) A STEM school; (vii) If the student was not enrolled in a district or school in the prior school year, whether either of the following apply to the student: (I) The student, in the prior school year, was exempted from attendance at school for the purpose of home education under section 3321.042 of the Revised Code. (II) The student, in the current school year, is enrolling in school in this state for the first time. (c) The number of scholarship students enrolled in the school for each of the five most recent school years; (d) The number of enrolled students with disabilities, disaggregated by disability category as described in section 3317.013 of the Revised Code; (e) The number of enrolled students who are English learners, as defined in section 3301.0731 of the Revised Code; (f) The number of enrolled students who are homeless; (g) The number of students who left the school in the prior school year without completing the school year or the student's planned course of study and that number presented as a percentage of the school's total enrolled students; (h) The tuition and fees charged by the school and a five-year cost trend of those charges; (i) Services the school offers for students with individualized education programs developed under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code or plans developed under Section 504 of the "Rehabilitation Act of 1973," 29 U.S.C. 794; (j) Any religious or faith-based instruction provided by the school; (k) The name of the school's accrediting body, if any, and the school's most recent accreditation or evaluation report. (2) Publish the information it reports to the department under divisions (C)(1)(b), (c), and (h) of this section on the school's publicly accessible web site; (3) Certify to the department its compliance with the criminal records check requirements for school employees established under Chapter 3319. of the Revised Code. (D) Each qualifying school shall submit a weekly report to the department on the attendance of enrolled scholarship students. Sec. 3301.167. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Adjusted gross income" has the same meaning as in section 5747.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Federal poverty guidelines" has the same meaning as in section 5101.46 of the Revised Code. (3) "Community school" means a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code. (4) "Scholarship student" has the same meaning as in section 3301.165 of the Revised Code. (5) "STEM school" means a STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code. (B) The department of education and workforce shall establish a system by which an individual may compare the performance data of scholarship students enrolled in a chartered nonpublic school with the performance data of similar students enrolled in the school district in which the school is located. The department shall make the system available on its publicly accessible web site. In calculating the performance of similar students under this section, the department shall consider age, grade, race and ethnicity, gender, and socioeconomic status. (C)(1) Annually, the department shall post on its publicly accessible web site the number of scholarship students disaggregated according to the following categories: (a) Students with a family adjusted gross income at or below two hundred per cent of the federal poverty guidelines; (b) Students with a family adjusted gross income above two hundred per cent of the federal poverty guidelines, but at or below four hundred fifty per cent of the federal poverty guidelines; (c) Students with a family adjusted gross income above four hundred fifty per cent of the federal poverty guidelines, but at or below five hundred per cent of the federal poverty guidelines; (d) Students with a family adjusted gross income above five hundred per cent of the federal poverty guidelines, but at or below five hundred fifty per cent of the federal poverty guidelines; (e) Students with a family adjusted gross income above five hundred fifty per cent of the federal poverty guidelines, but at or below six hundred per cent of the federal poverty guidelines; (f) Students with a family adjusted gross income above six hundred per cent of the federal poverty guidelines, but at or below six hundred fifty per cent of the federal poverty guidelines; (g) Students with a family adjusted gross income above six hundred fifty per cent of the federal poverty guidelines, but at or below seven hundred per cent of the federal poverty guidelines; (h) Students with a family adjusted gross income above seven hundred per cent of the federal poverty guidelines, but at or below seven hundred fifty per cent of the federal poverty guidelines; (i) Students with a family adjusted gross income above seven hundred fifty per cent of the federal poverty guidelines. The department may disaggregate data under division (C)(1) of this section according to other categories that the department determines are appropriate. (2) The department of education and workforce shall request from the department of taxation any data necessary for the department of education and workforce to compute and post data as required under division (C)(1) of this section. Sec. 3302.0311. As used in this section, "qualifying school" has the same meaning as in section 3301.166 of the Revised Code, The department of education and workforce shall establish a report card for qualifying schools. To the extent practicable, the department shall make that report card similar to the report card issued under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. The department annually shall issue a report card for each qualifying school not later than the fifteenth day of September or the preceding Friday when that day falls on Saturday or Sunday. The department shall include in the report card issued for a qualifying school the reports the school is required to make to the department under sections 3301.165 and 3301.166 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3310.03. For the 2021-2022 school year and each school year thereafter, subject to division (G) of this section, a student is an "eligible student" for purposes of the educational choice scholarship pilot program if the student's resident district is not a school district in which the pilot project scholarship program is operating under sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code, the student satisfies one of the conditions in division (A), (B), or (C) of this section, and the student maintains eligibility to receive a scholarship under division (D) of this section. However, any student who received a scholarship for the 2020-2021 school year under this section, as it existed prior to March 2, 2021, shall continue to receive that scholarship until the student completes grade twelve, as long as the student maintains eligibility to receive a scholarship under division (D) of this section. (A)(1) A student is eligible for a scholarship if the student is enrolled in a school building operated by the student's resident district and to which both of the following apply: (a) The building was ranked in the lowest twenty per cent of all buildings operated by city, local, and exempted village school districts according to performance index score as determined by the department of education and workforce, as follows: (i) For a scholarship sought for the 2021-2022 or 2022-2023 school year, the building was ranked in the lowest twenty per cent of buildings for each of the 2017-2018 and 2018-2019 school years. (ii) For a scholarship sought for the 2023-2024 school year, the building was ranked in the lowest twenty per cent of buildings for each of the 2018-2019 and 2021-2022 school years. (iii) For a scholarship sought for the 2024-2025 school year, the building was ranked in the lowest twenty per cent of buildings for each of the 2021-2022 and 2022-2023 school years. (iv) For a scholarship sought for the 2025-2026 school year or any school year thereafter, the building was ranked in the lowest twenty per cent of buildings for at least two of the three most recent consecutive rankings issued prior to the first day of July of the school year for which a scholarship is sought. (b) The building is operated by a school district in which, for the three consecutive school years prior to the school year for which a scholarship is sought, an average of twenty per cent or more of the students entitled to attend school in the district, under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code, were qualified to be included in the formula to distribute funds under Title I of the "Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965," 20 U.S.C. 6301 et seq. When ranking school buildings under division (A)(1) of this section, the department shall not include buildings operated by a school district in which the pilot project scholarship program is operating in accordance with sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code. (2) A student is eligible for a scholarship if the student will be enrolling in any of grades kindergarten through twelve in this state for the first time in the school year for which a scholarship is sought, will be at least five years of age, as defined in section 3321.01 of the Revised Code, by the first day of January of the school year for which a scholarship is sought, and otherwise would be assigned under section 3319.01 of the Revised Code in the school year for which a scholarship is sought, to a school building described in division (A)(1) of this section. (3) A student is eligible for a scholarship if the student is enrolled in a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code but otherwise would be assigned under section 3319.01 of the Revised Code to a building described in division (A)(1) of this section. (4) A student is eligible for a scholarship if the student is enrolled in a school building operated by the student's resident district or in a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code and otherwise would be assigned under section 3319.01 of the Revised Code to a school building described in division (A)(1) of this section in the school year for which the scholarship is sought. (5) A student is eligible for a scholarship if the student was enrolled in a public or nonpublic school or was homeschooled in the prior school year and completed any of grades eight through eleven in that school year and otherwise would be assigned under section 3319.01 of the Revised Code to a school building described in division (A)(1) of this section in the school year for which the scholarship is sought. (B) A student is eligible for a scholarship if the student is enrolled in a nonpublic school at the time the school is granted a charter by the director of education and workforce under section 3301.16 of the Revised Code and the student meets the standards of division (B) of section 3310.031 of the Revised Code. (C) A student is eligible for a scholarship if the student's resident district is subject to section 3302.10 of the Revised Code and the student either: (1) Is enrolled in a school building operated by the resident district or in a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code; (2) Will be both enrolling in any of grades kindergarten through twelve in this state for the first time and at least five years of age by the first day of January of the school year for which a scholarship is sought. (D) A student who receives a scholarship under the educational choice scholarship pilot program remains an eligible student and may continue to receive scholarships in subsequent school years until the student completes grade twelve, so long as all of the following apply: (1) The student's resident district remains the same, or the student transfers to a new resident district and otherwise would be assigned in the new resident district to a school building described in division (A)(1) or (C) of this section. (2) The student takes each assessment prescribed for the student's grade level under section 3301.0710, or 3301.0712, or 3313.619 of the Revised Code while enrolled in a chartered nonpublic school, unless one of the following applies to the student: (a) The student is excused from taking that assessment under federal law, the student's individualized education program, or division (C)(1)(c)(i) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code. (b) The student is enrolled in a chartered nonpublic school that meets the conditions specified in division (K)(2) or (L)(4) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code. (c) The student is enrolled in any of grades three to eight and takes an alternative standardized assessment under division (K)(1) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code. (d) The student is excused from taking the assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code pursuant to division (C)(1)(c)(ii) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code. (3) In each school year that the student is enrolled in a chartered nonpublic school, the student is absent from school for not more than twenty days that the school is open for instruction, not including excused absences. (E)(1) The department shall cease awarding first-time scholarships pursuant to divisions (A)(1) to (5) of this section with respect to a school building that, in the most recent ratings of school buildings under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code prior to the first day of July of the school year, ceases to meet the criteria in division (A)(1) of this section. (2) The department shall cease awarding first-time scholarships pursuant to division (C) of this section with respect to a school district subject to section 3302.10 of the Revised Code when the academic distress commission established for the district ceases to exist. (3) However, students who have received scholarships in the prior school year remain eligible students pursuant to division (D) of this section. (F) The department shall adopt rules defining excused absences for purposes of division (D)(3) of this section. (G) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section or section 3310.031 of the Revised Code, a student shall not be required to be enrolled or enrolling in a school building operated by the student's resident district or a community school in order to be eligible for a scholarship, as follows: (1) For a scholarship sought for the 2021-2022 school year, a student entering any of grades kindergarten through two; (2) For a scholarship sought for the 2022-2023 school year, a student entering any of grades kindergarten through four; (3) For a scholarship sought for the 2023-2024 school year, a student entering any of grades kindergarten through six; (4) For a scholarship sought for the 2024-2025 school year, a student entering any of grades kindergarten through eight; (5) For a scholarship sought for the 2025-2026 school year, and each school year thereafter, a student entering any of grades kindergarten through twelve. (H) Except as provided for in section 3310.13 of the Revised Code and in division (C)(2) of section 3365.07 of the Revised Code, the department shall not require the parent of a student who applies for or receives a scholarship under this section or section 3310.033, 3310.034, or 3310.035 of the Revised Code to complete any kind of income verification regarding the student's family income. Sec. 3310.13. (A) No chartered nonpublic school shall charge any student whose family income is at or below two hundred per cent of the federal poverty guidelines, as defined in section 5101.46 of the Revised Code, a tuition fee that is greater than the total amount paid for that student under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code. (B) A chartered nonpublic school may charge any other student who is paid a scholarship under that section up to the difference between the amount of the scholarship and the regular tuition charge of the school. Each chartered nonpublic school may permit such an eligible student's family to provide volunteer services in lieu of cash payment to pay all or part of the amount of the school's tuition not covered by the scholarship paid under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code. (C) Each chartered nonpublic school that charges a scholarship student an additional amount as authorized under division (B) of this section shall annually report to the department of education and workforce in the manner prescribed by the department the following: (1) The number of students charged; (2) The average of the amounts charged to such students. (D) On and after July 1, 2024, the department shall not require the parent of a student to submit a complete copy of the parent's federal income tax return, or a return filed under section 5747.08 of the Revised Code, to determine a student's family income for the purposes of the educational choice scholarship pilot program. Rather, the department may require a parent to submit a partial federal income tax return, or a return filed under section 5747.08 of the Revised Code, that only contains the minimum amount of information necessary to determine a student's family income. (E) No chartered nonpublic school participating in the educational choice scholarship pilot program shall require the parent of a student to disclose, as part of the school's admission procedure, whether the student's family income is at or below two hundred per cent of the federal poverty guidelines. (F) A chartered nonpublic school may accept scholarships issued by a scholarship granting organization authorized under section 5747.73 of the Revised Code as payment for the difference between the amount of the scholarship paid under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code and the regular tuition charge of the school, as well as for any fees regularly charged by the school. Each such school shall report annually to the department the family income of each student who receives a scholarship from a scholarship granting organization described in this division. (G) Not later than the thirtieth day of June of each year, each chartered nonpublic school that enrolls students who receive educational choice scholarships shall submit to the department of education and workforce, in a form and manner prescribed by the department, the tuition rates charged by the school for the following school year. Sec. 3310.14. (A) Except as provided in division (B) of this section, each chartered nonpublic school that is not subject to division (K)(1) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code and enrolls students awarded scholarships under sections 3310.01 to 3310.17 of the Revised Code annually shall administer the assessments prescribed by section 3301.0710, or 3301.0712, or 3313.619 of the Revised Code, as applicable, to each scholarship student enrolled in the school in accordance with section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code. Each chartered nonpublic school that is subject to this section shall report to the department of education and workforce the results of each assessment administered to each scholarship student under this section. Nothing in this section requires a chartered nonpublic school to administer any achievement assessment, except for an Ohio graduation test prescribed by division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 or the college and work ready assessment system prescribed by division (B) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code to any student enrolled in the school who is not a scholarship student. (B) A chartered nonpublic school that meets the conditions specified in division (K)(2) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code shall not be required to administer the elementary assessments prescribed by division (A) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3310.15. (A) The department of education and workforce annually shall compile the scores attained by scholarship students to whom an assessment is administered under section 3310.14 of the Revised Code. The scores shall be aggregated as follows: (1) By state, which shall include all students awarded a scholarship under the educational choice scholarship pilot program and who were required to take an assessment under section 3310.14 of the Revised Code; (2) By school district, which shall include all scholarship students who were required to take an assessment under section 3310.14 of the Revised Code and for whom the district is the student's resident district; (3) By chartered nonpublic school, which shall include all scholarship students enrolled in that school who were required to take an assessment under section 3310.14 of the Revised Code. (B) The department shall disaggregate the student performance data described in division (A) of this section according to the following categories: (1) Grade level; (2) Race and ethnicity; (3) Gender; (4) Students who have participated in the scholarship program for three or more years; (5) Students who have participated in the scholarship program for more than one year and less than three years; (6) Students who have participated in the scholarship program for one year or less; (7) Economically disadvantaged students. (C) The department shall post the student performance data required under divisions (A) and (B) of this section on its web site and, by the first fifteenth day of February September or the preceding Friday when that day falls on a Saturday or Sunday each year, shall distribute that data to the parent of each eligible student. In reporting student performance data under this division, the department shall not include any data that is statistically unreliable or that could result in the identification of individual students. For this purpose, the department shall not report performance data for any group that contains less than ten students. Not later than July 1, 2025, the department shall develop a measure of student growth for scholarship students enrolled in chartered nonpublic schools. The measure of student growth shall be used to report data annually on student growth for students in grades four through eight during the school year in which data is reported. No data shall be reported for schools with fewer than ten scholarship students. The department shall make the growth reports available on its publicly accessible web site. (D) The department shall provide the parent of each scholarship student with information comparing the student's performance on the assessments administered under section 3310.14 of the Revised Code with the average performance of similar students enrolled in the building operated by the student's resident district that the scholarship student would otherwise attend. In calculating the performance of similar students, the department shall consider age, grade, race and ethnicity, gender, and socioeconomic status. Sec. 3313.618. (A) In addition to the curriculum requirements specified by the board of education of a school district or governing authority of a chartered nonpublic school, each student entering ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2014, but prior to July 1, 2019, shall satisfy at least one of the following conditions or the conditions prescribed under division (B) of this section in order to qualify for a high school diploma: (1) Be remediation-free, in accordance with standards adopted under division (F) of section 3345.061 of the Revised Code, on each of the nationally standardized assessments in English, mathematics, and reading; (2) Attain a score specified under division (B)(5)(c) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code on the end-of-course examinations prescribed under division (B) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. (3) Attain a score that demonstrates workforce readiness and employability on a nationally recognized job skills assessment selected by the department of education and workforce under division (F) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code and obtain either an industry-recognized credential or a license issued by a state agency or board for practice in a vocation that requires an examination for issuance of that license. For the purposes of this division, the industry-recognized credentials and licenses shall be as approved under section 3313.6113 of the Revised Code. A student may choose to qualify for a high school diploma by satisfying any of the separate requirements prescribed by divisions (A)(1) to (3) of this section. If the student's school district or school does not administer the examination prescribed by one of those divisions that the student chooses to take to satisfy the requirements of this section, the school district or school may require that student to arrange for the applicable scores to be sent directly to the district or school by the company or organization that administers the examination. (B) In addition to the curriculum requirements specified by the district board or school governing authority, each student entering ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2019, shall satisfy the following conditions in order to qualify for a high school diploma: (1) Attain a competency score as determined under division (B)(10) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code on each of the Algebra I and English language arts II end-of-course examinations prescribed under division (B)(2) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. School districts and chartered nonpublic schools shall offer remedial support to any student who fails to attain a competency score on one or both of the Algebra I and English language arts II end-of-course examinations. Following the first administration of the exam, if a student fails to attain a competency score on one or both of the Algebra I and English language arts II end-of-course examinations that student must retake the respective examination at least once. If a student fails to attain a competency score on a retake examination, the student may demonstrate competency in the failed subject area through one of the following options: (a) Earn course credit taken through the college credit plus program established under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code in the failed subject area; (b) Complete two of the following options, one of which must be foundational: (i) Foundational options to demonstrate competency, which include earning a cumulative score of proficient or higher on three or more state technical assessments aligned with section 3313.903 of the Revised Code in a single career pathway, obtaining an industry-recognized credential, or group of credentials, approved under section 3313.6113 of the Revised Code that meet the criteria established under that section to qualify for a high school diploma, obtaining a license approved under section 3313.6113 of the Revised Code that is issued by a state agency or board for practice in a vocation that requires an examination for issuance of that license, completing a pre-apprenticeship aligned with options established under section 3313.904 of the Revised Code in the student's chosen career field, completing an apprenticeship registered with the apprenticeship council established under section 4139.02 of the Revised Code in the student's chosen career field, or providing evidence of acceptance into an apprenticeship program after high school that is restricted to participants eighteen years of age or older; (ii) Supporting options to demonstrate competency, which include completing two hundred fifty hours of a work-based learning experience with evidence of positive evaluations, obtaining an OhioMeansJobs-readiness seal under section 3313.6112 of the Revised Code, or attaining a workforce readiness score, as determined by the department, on the nationally recognized job skills assessment selected by the department under division (F) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. (c) Provide evidence that the student has enlisted in a branch of the armed services of the United States as defined in section 5910.01 of the Revised Code. (d) Be remediation-free, in accordance with standards adopted under division (F) of section 3345.061 of the Revised Code, in the failed subject area on a nationally standardized assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. For English language arts II, a student must be remediation-free in the subjects of English and reading on the nationally standardized assessment. Subject to division (L)(2) of section 3313.61 of the Revised Code, for any students receiving special education and related services under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code, the individualized education program developed for the student under that chapter shall specify the manner in which the student will participate in the assessments administered under this division or an alternate assessment in accordance with division (C)(1) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code. (2) Earn at least two of the state diploma seals prescribed under division (A) of section 3313.6114 of the Revised Code, at least one of which shall be any of the following: (a) The state seal of biliteracy established under section 3313.6111 of the Revised Code; (b) The OhioMeansJobs-readiness seal established under section 3313.6112 of the Revised Code; (c) One of the state diploma seals established under divisions (C)(1) to (7) of section 3313.6114 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) A student who transfers into an Ohio public or chartered nonpublic high school from another state or enrolls in such a high school after receiving home education or attending a nonchartered, nontax-supported school in the previous school year shall meet the requirements of division (B) or (D) of this section, as applicable, in order to qualify for a high school diploma. However, any student subject to division (B) of this section who transfers or enrolls after the start of the student's twelfth grade year and fails to attain a competency score on the Algebra I or English language arts II end-of-course examination shall not be required to retake the applicable examination prior to demonstrating competency in the failed subject area under the options prescribed in divisions (B)(1)(a) to (d) of this section. (2) The department shall prescribe standards that allow a transfer student who, prior to the student's transfer, took an assessment described in division (B)(1) or (2) of section 3301.0712 or section 3313.619 of the Revised Code to apply the score from that assessment towards graduation requirements at the student's new public or chartered nonpublic school. (D) Notwithstanding division (B) of this section, in addition to the curriculum requirements specified by the school governing authority, a chartered nonpublic school student subject to division (L)(3)(a)(ii)(L)(3)(a)(ii)(II) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code entering ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2019, shall qualify for a high school diploma if the student earns a remediation-free score in the areas of English, mathematics, and reading, in accordance with standards adopted under division (F) of section 3345.061 of the Revised Code, on a nationally standardized assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. No such student shall be required to take the Algebra I or English language arts II end-of-course examination or earn diploma seals under this section. (E) The department shall not create or require any additional assessment for the granting of any type of high school diploma other than as prescribed by this section. Except as provided in sections 3313.6111, 3313.6112, and 3313.6114 of the Revised Code, the department or the director of education and workforce shall not create any endorsement or designation that may be affiliated with a high school diploma. Sec. 3313.619. This section does not apply to a student participating in a general education state scholarship program, as defined in section 3301.165 of the Revised Code. Such student shall comply with section 3313.618 of the Revised Code in the same manner as a public school student. (A) In lieu of the assessment requirements prescribed by division (A) of section 3313.618 of the Revised Code or the requirements to demonstrate competency and earn diploma seals prescribed by division (B) of that section, a chartered nonpublic school may grant a high school diploma to a student who attains at least the designated score on an assessment approved by the department of education and workforce under division (B) of this section and selected by the school's governing authority. (B) For purposes of division (A) of this section, the department shall approve assessments that meet the conditions specified under division (C) of this section and shall designate passing scores for each of those assessments. (C) Each assessment approved under division (B) of this section shall be nationally norm-referenced, have internal consistency reliability coefficients of at least "0.8," be standardized, have specific evidence of content, concurrent, or criterion validity, have evidence of norming studies in the previous ten years, have a measure of student achievement in core academic areas, and have high validity evidenced by the alignment of the assessment with nationally recognized content. (D) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a chartered nonpublic school from granting a high school diploma to a student if the student satisfies the applicable requirements prescribed by section 3313.618 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3313.6612. Each school district and chartered nonpublic school shall maintain a disciplinary record for each student who is subject to a disciplinary action. The record shall include a description of each incident that resulted in disciplinary action by the district or school. The disciplinary record of a student who is enrolled in a public school is subject to section 3319.321 of the Revised Code and the "Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974," 20 U.S.C. 1232g. Sec. 3313.976. (A) No private school may receive scholarship payments from parents pursuant to section 3317.022 of the Revised Code until the chief administrator of the private school registers the school with the director of education and workforce. The director shall register any school that meets the following requirements: (1) The school indicates in writing its commitment to follow all requirements for a state-sponsored scholarship program specified under sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code, including, but not limited to, the requirements for admitting students pursuant to section 3313.977 of the Revised Code; (2) The school meets all state minimum standards for chartered nonpublic schools in effect on July 1, 1992, except that the director at the director's discretion may register nonchartered nonpublic schools meeting the other requirements of this division; (3) The school does not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, or ethnic background; (4) The school enrolls a minimum of ten students per class or a sum of at least twenty-five students in all the classes offered; (5) The school does not advocate or foster unlawful behavior or teach hatred of any person or group on the basis of race, ethnicity, national origin, or religion; (6) The school does not provide false or misleading information about the school to parents, students, or the general public; (7) For students in grades kindergarten through eight with family incomes at or below two hundred per cent of the federal poverty guidelines, as defined in section 5101.46 of the Revised Code, the school agrees not to charge any tuition in excess of the scholarship amount established pursuant to division (A)(11)(a) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code, excluding any increase described in that division. (8) For students in grades kindergarten through eight with family incomes above two hundred per cent of the federal poverty guidelines, whose scholarship amounts are less than the actual tuition charge of the school, the school agrees not to charge any tuition in excess of the difference between the actual tuition charge of the school and the scholarship amount established pursuant to division (A)(11)(a) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code, excluding any increase described in that division. The school shall permit such tuition, at the discretion of the parent, to be satisfied by the family's provision of in-kind contributions or services. (9) The school agrees not to charge any tuition to families of students in grades nine through twelve receiving a scholarship in excess of the actual tuition charge of the school less the scholarship amount established pursuant to division (A)(11)(a) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code, excluding any increase described in that division. (10) It annually administers the applicable assessments prescribed by section 3301.0710, or 3301.0712, or 3313.619 of the Revised Code to each scholarship student enrolled in the school in accordance with section 3301.0711 or 3301.0712 of the Revised Code and reports to the department of education the results of each such assessment administered to each scholarship student, unless one of the following applies to the student: (a) The student is excused from taking that assessment under federal law, the student's individualized education program, or division (C)(1)(c)(i) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code. (b) The student is enrolled in a chartered nonpublic school that meets the conditions specified in division (K)(2) or (L)(4) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code. (c) The student is enrolled in any of grades three to eight and takes an alternative standardized assessment under division (K)(1) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code. (d) The student is excused from taking the assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code pursuant to division (C)(1)(c)(ii) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code. (B) The director shall revoke the registration of any school if, after a hearing, the director determines that the school is in violation of any of the provisions of division (A) of this section. (C) Any public school located in a school district adjacent to the pilot project school district may receive scholarship payments on behalf of parents pursuant to section 3317.022 of the Revised Code if the superintendent of the district in which such public school is located notifies the director prior to the first day of March that the district intends to admit students from the pilot project school district for the ensuing school year pursuant to section 3327.06 of the Revised Code. (D) Any parent wishing to purchase tutorial assistance from any person or governmental entity pursuant to the pilot project program under sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code shall apply to the director. The director shall approve providers who appear to possess the capability of furnishing the instructional services they are offering to provide. (E) On and after July 1, 2024, the director shall not require the parent of a student to submit a complete copy of the parent's federal income tax return, or a return filed under section 5747.08 of the Revised Code, to determine a student's family income for the purposes of the pilot project scholarship program. Rather, the director may require a parent to submit a partial federal income tax return, or a return filed under section 5747.08 of the Revised Code, that only contains the minimum amount of information necessary to determine a student's family income. (F) Not later than the thirtieth day of June of each year, each private school registered under this section shall submit to the director of education and workforce, in a form and manner prescribed by the director, the tuition rates charged by the school for the following school year. Sec. 3314.03. A copy of every contract entered into under this section shall be filed with the director of education and workforce. The department of education and workforce shall make available on its web site a copy of every approved, executed contract filed with the director under this section. (A) Each contract entered into between a sponsor and the governing authority of a community school shall specify the following: (1) That the school shall be established as either of the following: (a) A nonprofit corporation established under Chapter 1702. of the Revised Code, if established prior to April 8, 2003; (b) A public benefit corporation established under Chapter 1702. of the Revised Code, if established after April 8, 2003. (2) The education program of the school, including the school's mission and educational philosophy, the characteristics of the students the school is expected to attract, the ages and grades of students, and the focus of the curriculum; (3) The academic goals to be achieved and the method of measurement that will be used to determine progress toward those goals, which shall include the statewide achievement assessments; (4) Performance standards, including but not limited to all applicable report card measures set forth in section 3302.03 or 3314.017 of the Revised Code, by which the success of the school will be evaluated by the sponsor; (5) The admission standards of section 3314.06 of the Revised Code and, if applicable, section 3314.061 of the Revised Code; (6)(a) Dismissal procedures; (b) A requirement that the governing authority adopt an attendance policy that includes a procedure for automatically withdrawing a student from the school if the student without a legitimate excuse fails to participate in seventy-two consecutive hours of the learning opportunities offered to the student. (7) The ways by which the school will achieve racial and ethnic balance reflective of the community it serves; (8) Requirements for financial audits by the auditor of state. The contract shall require financial records of the school to be maintained in the same manner as are financial records of school districts, pursuant to rules of the auditor of state. Audits shall be conducted in accordance with section 117.10 of the Revised Code. (9) An addendum to the contract outlining the facilities to be used that contains at least the following information: (a) A detailed description of each facility used for instructional purposes; (b) The annual costs associated with leasing each facility that are paid by or on behalf of the school; (c) The annual mortgage principal and interest payments that are paid by the school; (d) The name of the lender or landlord, identified as such, and the lender's or landlord's relationship to the operator, if any. (10) Qualifications of employees, including both of the following: (a) A requirement that the school's classroom teachers be licensed in accordance with sections 3319.22 to 3319.31 of the Revised Code, except that a community school may engage noncertificated persons to teach up to twelve hours or forty hours per week pursuant to section 3319.301 of the Revised Code; (b) A prohibition against the school employing an individual described in section 3314.104 of the Revised Code in any position. (11) That the school will comply with the following requirements: (a) The school will provide learning opportunities to a minimum of twenty-five students for a minimum of nine hundred twenty hours per school year. (b) The governing authority will purchase liability insurance, or otherwise provide for the potential liability of the school. (c) The school will be nonsectarian in its programs, admission policies, employment practices, and all other operations, and will not be operated by a sectarian school or religious institution. (d) The school will comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 109.65, 121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 3301.0710, 3301.0711, 3301.0712, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.24, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.472, 3313.473, 3313.474, 3313.50, 3313.539, 3313.5310, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 3313.608, 3313.609, 3313.6012, 3313.6013, 3313.6014, 3313.6020, 3313.6024, 3313.6026, 3313.6028, 3313.6029, 3313.6031, 3313.643, 3313.648, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.66, 3313.661, 3313.662, 3313.666, 3313.667, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.6612, 3313.67, 3313.671, 3313.672, 3313.673, 3313.69, 3313.71, 3313.716, 3313.718, 3313.719, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.80, 3313.814, 3313.816, 3313.817, 3313.818, 3313.819, 3313.8110, 3313.86, 3313.89, 3313.96, 3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.0812, 3319.238, 3319.318, 3319.321, 3319.324, 3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.41, 3319.46, 3319.90, 3319.614, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3321.01, 3321.041, 3321.13, 3321.14, 3321.141, 3321.17, 3321.18, 3321.19, 3322.20, 3322.24, 3323.251, 3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 5502.262, 5502.703, and 5705.391 and Chapters 117., 1347., 2744., 3365., 3742., 4112., 4123., 4141., and 4167. of the Revised Code as if it were a school district and will comply with section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code in the manner specified in section 3314.17 of the Revised Code. (e) The school shall comply with Chapter 102. and section 2921.42 of the Revised Code. (f) The school will comply with sections 3313.61, 3313.611, 3313.614, 3313.617, 3313.618, and 3313.6114 of the Revised Code, except that for students who enter ninth grade for the first time before July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 3313.61 and 3313.611 of the Revised Code that a person must successfully complete the curriculum in any high school prior to receiving a high school diploma may be met by completing the curriculum adopted by the governing authority of the community school rather than the curriculum specified in Title XXXIII of the Revised Code or any rules of the department. Beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 3313.61 and 3313.611 of the Revised Code that a person must successfully complete the curriculum of a high school prior to receiving a high school diploma shall be met by completing the requirements prescribed in section 3313.6027 and division (C) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code, unless the person qualifies under division (D) or (F) of that section. Each school shall comply with the plan for awarding high school credit based on demonstration of subject area competency, and beginning with the 2017-2018 school year, with the updated plan that permits students enrolled in seventh and eighth grade to meet curriculum requirements based on subject area competency adopted by the department under divisions (J)(1) and (2) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code. Beginning with the 2018-2019 school year, the school shall comply with the framework for granting units of high school credit to students who demonstrate subject area competency through work-based learning experiences, internships, or cooperative education developed by the department under division (J)(3) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code. (g) The school governing authority will submit within four months after the end of each school year a report of its activities and progress in meeting the goals and standards of divisions (A)(3) and (4) of this section and its financial status to the sponsor and the parents of all students enrolled in the school. (h) The school, unless it is an internet- or computer-based community school, will comply with section 3313.801 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. (i) If the school is the recipient of moneys from a grant awarded under the federal race to the top program, Division (A), Title XIV, Sections 14005 and 14006 of the "American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009," Pub. L. No. 111-5, 123 Stat. 115, the school will pay teachers based upon performance in accordance with section 3317.141 and will comply with section 3319.111 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. (j) If the school operates a preschool program that is licensed by the department under sections 3301.52 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code, the school shall comply with sections 3301.50 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code and the minimum standards for preschool programs prescribed in rules adopted by the department of children and youth under section 3301.53 of the Revised Code. (k) The school will comply with sections 3313.6021 and 3313.6023 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district unless it is either of the following: (i) An internet- or computer-based community school; (ii) A community school in which a majority of the enrolled students are children with disabilities as described in division (B)(2) of section 3314.35 of the Revised Code. (l) The school will comply with section 3321.191 of the Revised Code, unless it is an internet- or computer-based community school that is subject to section 3314.261 of the Revised Code. (m) The school will comply with section 3313.7118 of the Revised Code if it serves elementary school students. (12) Arrangements for providing health and other benefits to employees; (13) The length of the contract, which shall begin at the beginning of an academic year. No contract shall exceed five years unless such contract has been renewed pursuant to division (D) of this section. (14) The governing authority of the school, which shall be responsible for carrying out the provisions of the contract; (15) A financial plan detailing an estimated school budget for each year of the period of the contract and specifying the total estimated per pupil expenditure amount for each such year. (16) Requirements and procedures regarding the disposition of employees of the school in the event the contract is terminated or not renewed pursuant to section 3314.07 of the Revised Code; (17) Whether the school is to be created by converting all or part of an existing public school or educational service center building or is to be a new start-up school, and if it is a converted public school or service center building, both of the following: (a) Specification of any duties or responsibilities of an employer that the board of education or service center governing board that operated the school or building before conversion is delegating to the governing authority of the community school with respect to all or any specified group of employees provided the delegation is not prohibited by a collective bargaining agreement applicable to such employees; (b) Alternative arrangements for current public school students who choose not to attend the converted school and for teachers who choose not to teach in the school or building after conversion. (18) Provisions establishing procedures for resolving disputes or differences of opinion between the sponsor and the governing authority of the community school; (19) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt a policy regarding the admission of students who reside outside the district in which the school is located. That policy shall comply with the admissions procedures specified in sections 3314.06 and 3314.061 of the Revised Code and, at the sole discretion of the authority, shall do one of the following: (a) Prohibit the enrollment of students who reside outside the district in which the school is located; (b) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in districts adjacent to the district in which the school is located; (c) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in any other district in the state. (20) A provision recognizing the authority of the department to take over the sponsorship of the school in accordance with the provisions of division (C) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code; (21) A provision recognizing the sponsor's authority to assume the operation of a school under the conditions specified in division (B) of section 3314.073 of the Revised Code; (22) A provision recognizing both of the following: (a) The authority of public health and safety officials to inspect the facilities of the school and to order the facilities closed if those officials find that the facilities are not in compliance with health and safety laws and regulations; (b) The authority of the department as the community school oversight body to suspend the operation of the school under section 3314.072 of the Revised Code if the department has evidence of conditions or violations of law at the school that pose an imminent danger to the health and safety of the school's students and employees and the sponsor refuses to take such action. (23) A description of the learning opportunities that will be offered to students including both classroom-based and non-classroom-based learning opportunities that is in compliance with criteria for student participation established by the department under division (H)(2) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code; (24) The school will comply with sections 3302.04 and 3302.041 of the Revised Code, except that any action required to be taken by a school district pursuant to those sections shall be taken by the sponsor of the school. (25) Beginning in the 2006-2007 school year, the school will open for operation not later than the thirtieth day of September each school year, unless the mission of the school as specified under division (A)(2) of this section is solely to serve dropouts. In its initial year of operation, if the school fails to open by the thirtieth day of September, or within one year after the adoption of the contract pursuant to division (D) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code if the mission of the school is solely to serve dropouts, the contract shall be void. (26) Whether the school's governing authority is planning to seek designation for the school as a STEM school equivalent under section 3326.032 of the Revised Code; (27) That the school's attendance and participation policies will be available for public inspection; (28) That the school's attendance and participation records shall be made available to the department, auditor of state, and school's sponsor to the extent permitted under and in accordance with the "Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974," 88 Stat. 571, 20 U.S.C. 1232g, as amended, and any regulations promulgated under that act, and section 3319.321 of the Revised Code; (29) If a school operates using the blended learning model, as defined in section 3301.079 of the Revised Code, all of the following information: (a) An indication of what blended learning model or models will be used; (b) A description of how student instructional needs will be determined and documented; (c) The method to be used for determining competency, granting credit, and promoting students to a higher grade level; (d) The school's attendance requirements, including how the school will document participation in learning opportunities; (e) A statement describing how student progress will be monitored; (f) A statement describing how private student data will be protected; (g) A description of the professional development activities that will be offered to teachers. (30) A provision requiring that all moneys the school's operator loans to the school, including facilities loans or cash flow assistance, must be accounted for, documented, and bear interest at a fair market rate; (31) A provision requiring that, if the governing authority contracts with an attorney, accountant, or entity specializing in audits, the attorney, accountant, or entity shall be independent from the operator with which the school has contracted. (32) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt an enrollment and attendance policy that requires a student's parent to notify the community school in which the student is enrolled when there is a change in the location of the parent's or student's primary residence. (33) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt a student residence and address verification policy for students enrolling in or attending the school. (34) A provision establishing the process by which the governing authority of the school will be selected in the future. (35) A description of the management and administration of the school. (36) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt policies and procedures to establish internal financial controls for the school. (B) A contract entered into under section 3314.02 of the Revised Code between a sponsor and the governing authority of a community school may provide for the community school governing authority to make payments to the sponsor, which is hereby authorized to receive such payments as set forth in the contract between the governing authority and the sponsor. The total amount of such payments for monitoring, oversight, and technical assistance of the school shall not exceed three per cent of the total amount of payments for operating expenses that the school receives from the state. (C) The contract shall specify the duties of the sponsor which shall be in accordance with the written agreement entered into with the department under division (B) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code and shall include the following: (1) Monitor the community school's compliance with all laws applicable to the school and with the terms of the contract; (2) Monitor and evaluate the academic and fiscal performance and the organization and operation of the community school on at least an annual basis; (3) Provide technical assistance to the community school in complying with laws applicable to the school and terms of the contract; (4) Take steps to intervene in the school's operation to correct problems in the school's overall performance, declare the school to be on probationary status pursuant to section 3314.073 of the Revised Code, suspend the operation of the school pursuant to section 3314.072 of the Revised Code, or terminate the contract of the school pursuant to section 3314.07 of the Revised Code as determined necessary by the sponsor; (5) Have in place a plan of action to be undertaken in the event the community school experiences financial difficulties or closes prior to the end of a school year. (D) Upon the expiration of a contract entered into under this section, the sponsor of a community school may, with the approval of the governing authority of the school, renew that contract for a period of time determined by the sponsor, but not ending earlier than the end of any school year, if the sponsor finds that the school's compliance with applicable laws and terms of the contract and the school's progress in meeting the academic goals prescribed in the contract have been satisfactory. Any contract that is renewed under this division remains subject to the provisions of sections 3314.07, 3314.072, and 3314.073 of the Revised Code. (E) If a community school fails to open for operation within one year after the contract entered into under this section is adopted pursuant to division (D) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code or permanently closes prior to the expiration of the contract, the contract shall be void and the school shall not enter into a contract with any other sponsor. A school shall not be considered permanently closed because the operations of the school have been suspended pursuant to section 3314.072 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3319.324. (A) As used in this section, "school records" includes any academic records, student assessment data, disciplinary record, or other information for which there is a legitimate educational interest. (B) Except as provided for in division (C) of this section, when any school district or chartered nonpublic school receives a request from another district or school to which a student has transferred for that student's school records, the district or school receiving the request shall respond, within five school days after receiving the request, by transmitting to the requesting district or school either the student's school records as authorized under section 3319.321 of the Revised Code or, if the district or school has no record of the student's attendance, a statement of that fact. (C) Except as provided for in division (E) of this section, a district or school may withhold a student's school records if there is two thousand five hundred dollars or more of outstanding debt attributed to the student. The district or school shall transmit the student's school records in the manner specified under division (A) of this section once the debt is paid. (D) The provisions of this section are in addition to, and do not affect the obligations of a school district or school to comply with, the requirements of division (D) of section 3313.642 and section 3313.672 of the Revised Code. (E) A district or school shall not withhold records related to a student's expulsion under division (B)(6) of section 3313.66 of the Revised Code due to outstanding debt attributed to the student. Sec. 3326.11. Each science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under this chapter and its governing body shall comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 109.65, 121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 2921.42, 2921.43, 3301.0714, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.24, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.14, 3313.15, 3313.16, 3313.18, 3313.201, 3313.26, 3313.472, 3313.473, 3313.474, 3313.48, 3313.481, 3313.482, 3313.50, 3313.539, 3313.5310, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 3313.608, 3313.6012, 3313.6013, 3313.6014, 3313.6020, 3313.6021, 3313.6023, 3313.6024, 3313.6026, 3313.6028, 3313.6029, 3313.6031, 3313.61, 3313.611, 3313.614, 3313.615, 3313.617, 3313.618, 3313.6114, 3313.643, 3313.648, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.66, 3313.661, 3313.662, 3313.666, 3313.667, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.6612, 3313.67, 3313.671, 3313.672, 3313.673, 3313.69, 3313.71, 3313.716, 3313.717, 3313.718, 3313.719, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.7118, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.80, 3313.801, 3313.814, 3313.816, 3313.817, 3313.818, 3313.819, 3313.8110, 3313.86, 3313.89, 3313.96, 3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.0812, 3319.21, 3319.238, 3319.318, 3319.32, 3319.321, 3319.324, 3319.35, 3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.41, 3319.45, 3319.46, 3319.614, 3319.90, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3321.01, 3321.041, 3321.05, 3321.13, 3321.14, 3321.141, 3321.17, 3321.18, 3321.19, 3321.191, 3322.20, 3322.24, 3323.251, 3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 5502.262, 5502.703, and 5705.391 and Chapters 102., 117., 1347., 2744., 3307., 3309., 3365., 3742., 4112., 4123., 4141., and 4167. of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. Section 2. That existing sections 3301.0711, 3310.03, 3310.13, 3310.14, 3310.15, 3313.618, 3313.619, 3313.976, 3314.03, 3319.324, and 3326.11 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. Sections 1 and 2 of this act take effect July 1, 2027. Section 4. This act shall be known as the Take the Dough, We Gotta Know Act. Section 5. The General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, finds that the following sections, presented in this act as composites of the sections as amended by the acts indicated, are the resulting versions of the sections in effect prior to the effective date of the sections as presented in this act: Section 3314.03 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 10 and H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly. Section 3326.11 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 10 and H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly.